Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 7. Employment of People with Disabilities

§ 497.
Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to carry on a continuing program to promote the employment of people with disabilities in Vermont by creating statewide interest in the rehabilitation and employment of people with disabilities and by obtaining and maintaining cooperation with all public and private groups and individuals in this field.

HISTORY:

1963, No. 200

, § 1, eff. June 29, 1963; amended

1991, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 497a.
Committee established.

There is hereby established a permanent committee to be known as the Vermont Governor’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities, to consist of 23 members, including one representative each from the Vermont Department of Labor’s Workforce Development Division and the Jobs for Veterans State Grant, one representative from the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, Vocational Rehabilitation Division and one from the Division for the Blind and Visually Impaired, one representative of the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, one representative of the State of Vermont Office of Veterans Affairs, and 17 members to be appointed by the Governor. The appointive members shall hold office for the term specified or until their successors are named by the Governor. The members shall receive no salary for their services as such, but the necessary expenses of the Committee shall be paid by the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 200

, § 2, eff. June 29, 1963; amended

1991, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 51;

2015, No. 51

, § C.5, eff. June 3, 2015.

§ 497b.
Duties.

The Committee shall coordinate a program to promote the employment of people with disabilities by creating statewide interest in the rehabilitation and employment of people with disabilities and by obtaining and maintaining cooperation from all public and private groups in this field. The Committee shall work in cooperation with the President’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities in order to carry out more effectively the purposes of this subchapter.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 200

, § 3, eff. June 29, 1963; amended

1985, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 13, 1986;

1991, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 51, eff. May 14, 2012.

§ 497c.
Disability awareness month.

The month of October is designated as “Disability Awareness Month.”

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 200

, § 4, eff. June 29, 1963; amended

1991, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 497d.
Powers.

The Vermont Governor’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities is authorized to receive any gifts, grants, or donations made for any of the purposes of its program.

HISTORY:

1963, No. 200

, § 6, eff. June 29, 1963; amended

1991, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 497e.
Funds; revenue; use.

The Chair of the Governor’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities or his or her designated representative may authorize or sponsor fund-raising events and the revenue therefrom shall be placed in the account of the Governor’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities.

The Chair or his or her designated representative may authorize the sale of products which relate to Vermonters with disabilities and the revenue therefrom shall be placed in the account of the Governor’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities.

The funds credited to the Governor’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities shall remain in the special account from year to year and shall not be put back into the General Fund.

The Governor’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities is also authorized to receive and keep in its account any gifts, grants, or donations.

This account will be used in accordance with any of the purposes of the Governor’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities program or activities, as established in this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 87

; amended

1991, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 131.

§ 498.
Repealed. 1981, No. 65, § 6.